Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB315.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 27A.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a Judicial Council composed of the following persons:
(a) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or his or her designee from among
the members of the Supreme Court[that court];
(b) The Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals or his or her designee from among
the members of the Court of Appeals[that court];
(c) Four (4) Circuit Judges, and four (4) District Judges, all of whom shall be
appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;
(d) The president of the Kentucky Association of Circuit Court Clerks;
(e) Three (3) members of the State Bar of Kentucky who shall be appointed by its
board of governors; and
(f) The chairs[chairmen] of the Judiciary Committees of the House of
Representatives and of the Senate, or the vice chair[chairman] of either[any]
of these committees if the chair[chairman] declines to serve.
(2) (a) The appointed members shall serve for a term of four (4) years or[and] until
their successors are appointed and qualify.
(b) Vacancies in the office of appointed members shall be filled by the original
appointing authority.
(3) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be the chair[chairman] of the council,
or if the Chief Justice[he] is not a member or declines to serve as chair[chairman],
a member of the council shall be appointed by the Chief Justice[him] to serve as
chair[chairman].
(4) The[ administrative] director of the Administrative Office of the Courts[ courts]
shall serve as secretary.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 9:17 AM Jacketed